Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.510.270

County treasurer's duties.

The county treasurer of each county of this state shall be ex officio treasurer of the several school districts of their respective counties, and, except as otherwise provided by law, it shall be the duty of each county treasurer:

(1) To receive and hold all moneys belonging to such school districts, and to pay them only for legally authorized obligations of the district.

(2) To prepare and submit to each school district superintendent in the county a written report of the state of the finances of such district on the first day of each month, which report shall be submitted not later than the seventh business day of the month, which report shall contain the balance on hand the first of the preceding month, the funds paid in, warrants paid with interest thereon, if any, the number of warrants issued and not paid, and the balance on hand.

(3) The treasurer of each county shall submit a statement of all canceled warrants of districts to the respective school district superintendents. The canceled warrants of each district shall be preserved separately and shall at all times be open to inspection by the school district superintendent or by any authorized accountant of such district.

[ 1991 c 245 s 2; 1990 c 33 s 428; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 28; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 73; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 114; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.48.100. Prior: 1911 c 85 s 1; 1909 c 97 p 309 s 1; RRS s 4867; prior: 1907 c 240 s 8; 1897 c 118 s 59; 1893 c 109 s 8; 1891 c 127 s 27; 1890 p 380 s 71; 1886 p 26 s 83; Code 1881 s 3236. Formerly RCW 28A.48.100, 28.48.100.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118: See note following RCW 28A.505.010.

Rights preserved—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.